Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.024

Awards of procurement contracts to veteran-owned businesses.

All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after June 10, 2010, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

[ 2010 c 5 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—2010 c 5: See notes following RCW 43.60A.010.